South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S264.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 37, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-37-160. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any real property upon which farm buildings or agricultural structures exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 12-37-220(B)(14) are situated or any real property that is assessed pursuant to Section 12-43-220(d), or any real property under direct or indirect common ownership that is adjacent to the exempt property, may not be annexed by a municipality without the express written agreement of the owner of the real property to be annexed. SECTION 2.  Chapter 3, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-3-25.  No municipality may annex, under the provisions of this chapter, any real property upon which farm buildings or agricultural structures exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 12-37-220(B)(14) are situated or any real property that is assessed pursuant to Section 12-43-220(d), or any real property under direct or indirect common ownership that is adjacent to the exempt property, without the express written agreement of the owner of the real property to be annexed as provided in Section 12-37-160. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----